Nevada, session 83, SB61.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 268 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. If a regional planning coalition has not been
established pursuant to NRS 278.02514, the board of county
-
*SB61*

– 4 –
commissioners shall appoint a similar public body that is
responsible for the development of comprehensive policy planning
in the region to carry out any duty assigned to the regional
planning coalition pursuant to NRS 268.570 to 268.608, inclusive,
and sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 3. 1. The governing body of each city in a county
whose population is 700,000 or more shall adopt a program of
annexation. The program must identify areas in any sphere of
influence of the city to be considered for annexation within the
next 7 years. The governing body shall not consider the
annexation of any area that is not within the designated sphere of
influence and is not included in its program of annexation.
2. Before adopting a program of annexation pursuant to
subsection 1, the governing body must hold one or more public
hearings. Notice of the time and place of the hearing must be
mailed to all owners of real property in the proposed program of
annexation. At the public hearing the governing body shall
consider:
(a) The location of any property to be considered for
annexation;
(b) The logical extension of city limits;
(c) The need for the expansion to accommodate planned
regional growth;
(d) The location of existing and planned water and sewer
service;
(e) Community goals that would be met by any proposed
annexation;
(f) The efficient and cost-effective provision of service areas
and capital facilities; and
(g) Any other factors concerning any proposed annexation
deemed appropriate for consideration by the governing body of the
city.
3. The governing body shall submit its program of
annexation adopted pursuant to subsection 1 to the regional
planning coalition and the county in which the city is located for
recommendations.
4. The regional planning coalition must certify that a
program of annexation adopted pursuant to subsection 1 conforms
with the comprehensive regional policy plan, if adopted pursuant
to NRS 278.02528, before the program is put into effect. The city
may appeal an adverse determination of the regional planning
coalition by filing an objection within 45 days after the issuance of
that determination. The objection must include the reasons why
the program of annexation conforms with the comprehensive
-
*SB61*

– 5 –
regional policy plan, if a comprehensive regional policy plan has
been adopted.
5. The regional planning coalition shall consider any appeal
filed pursuant to subsection 4 and issue its final determination of
conformance or nonconformance within 45 days after the
objection is filed.
6. After the regional planning coalition certifies the program
of annexation pursuant to subsection 4, any facilities plan, capital
improvement program, development project or location of facilities
by a county, city, annexation commission, regional planning
coalition or any other affected entity must be consistent with the
certified program of annexation.
Sec. 4. 1. There is hereby created, in each county of the
State whose population is 700,000 or more, a city annexation and
detachment commission which consists of members to be
appointed as follows:
(a) Two members representing the county, one of whom must
be the chair of the board of county commissioners and the other a
member of the board to be chosen by the board.
(b) One member representing each city, who must be a
member of the governing body of the city to be chosen by the
governing body.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
members of the city annexation and detachment commission serve
for terms of 2 years. Any member who ceases to be a member of
the body from which the member was chosen ceases to be a
member of the commission. A vacancy must be filled for the
remainder of the unexpired term by the body which made the
original selection.
3. The members of the city annexation and detachment
commission:
(a) Shall elect a chair and vice chair of the commission from
among the members; and
(b) Serve without compensation.
4. The representative of any city incorporated on or after
October 1, 2025, must be selected within 30 days after the first
meeting of the governing body and must serve until the next
ensuing December 31 of an even-numbered year until the
selection and qualification of his or her successor.
5. The governing body of a county and each city in the county
may execute an interlocal agreement to transfer the duties of the
city annexation and detachment commission to the regional
planning coalition.
Sec. 5. 1. The commission shall:
-
*SB61*

– 6 –
(a) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 268.581, review and
approve or disapprove, with or without amendment, wholly,
partially or conditionally, proposals for the annexation or
detachment of territory to cities within the county;
(b) Adopt procedures for the evaluation of proposals for the
annexation or detachment of territory to cities within the county;
and
(c) On or before July 1 of each year, prepare and adopt a
budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal year and submit that
budget to the governing body of the county as a recommendation
for funding.
2. The commission may employ persons, contract for services
necessary or incur usual and necessary expenses for the
performance of its duties and functions specified in NRS 268.570
to 268.608, inclusive, and sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 6. 1. The governing body of any city may, by
ordinance, detach and sever from the city any territory within the
corporate limits of the city subject to the provisions of this section.
To initiate the detachment of any territory on its own motion or
upon petition as set forth in NRS 268.582, the governing body
shall:
(a) Prepare and file with the city clerk a report of a plan for
the detachment of services to the territory that complies with the
requirements of section 7 of this act; and
(b) After filing the report pursuant to paragraph (a), file a
petition for detachment with the board of county commissioners
which must include:
(1) An accurate map or plat made and certified by a
licensed surveyor showing the boundaries of the territory proposed
to be detached and the boundaries of the city proposed to be
contracted;
(2) The report of the plan for the detachment of services
prepared pursuant to paragraph (a); and
(3) A brief statement of the reasons for the proposed
detachment.
2. Not later than 60 days after receiving a petition for
detachment pursuant to subsection 1, the board of county
commissioners shall pass a resolution approving the detachment,
approving the detachment with conditions or disapproving the
detachment. The board of county commissioners shall notify the
city clerk not later than 5 days after passing the resolution.
3. If the detachment is approved or approved with conditions,
not later than 7 days after receiving notice of the resolution
pursuant to subsection 2, the city clerk shall file with the
commission a notice of the intention of the governing body to
-
*SB61*

– 7 –
initiate the detachment, which must include, without limitation,
the resolution passed by the board of county commissioners and
the report required by subsection 1.
4. If the board of county commissioners disapproves the
detachment, the governing body shall not initiate the detachment
of the same or substantially the same territory for at least 1 year
after the date of the resolution disapproving the detachment.
Sec. 7. The report of the plan for detachment required by
section 6 of this act must include, without limitation:
1. An accurate map or plat of the area to be detached made
and certified by a licensed surveyor showing:
(a) The boundaries of the territory proposed to be detached;
(b) The existing boundaries of the city and the boundaries
proposed to be contracted; and
(c) The location of the streets, sewers and water lines in the
city;
2. A map of the existing land use plan of:
(a) The city for the territory proposed to be detached; and
(b) The county for the area surrounding the territory proposed
to be detached;
3. A schedule of the municipal services that are provided by
the city to the territory proposed to be detached, including, without
limitation, police protection, fire protection, ambulance, street
maintenance and garbage collection; and
4. Whether any of the parcels in the territory proposed to be
detached belong to a local or special improvement district or a
redevelopment area created pursuant to chapter 279 of NRS.
Sec. 8. 1. Not later than 5 days after a notice is filed with
the commission pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 268.578 or
subsection 3 of section 6 of this act, the executive officer of the
commission shall transmit a copy of the notice to:
(a) The regional planning coalition that has jurisdiction over
the area proposed to be annexed or detached, if the duties of the
commission have not been transferred to the regional planning
coalition pursuant to subsection 5 of section 4 of this act; and
(b) The board of county commissioners of the county that has
jurisdiction over the area proposed to be annexed or detached.
2. Not later than 30 days after receiving the notice from the
commission pursuant to subsection 1, the regional planning
coalition shall review the proposed annexation or detachment in
light of any master plan adopted by the regional planning
coalition and any other information in the possession of the
regional planning coalition and report its findings to the
commission.
-
*SB61*

– 8 –
3. The commission may request the advice and shall consider
the master plan of any city planning commission or county
planning commission or staff thereof, city council or board of
county commissioners whose territory is located not more than 7
miles from the territory proposed to be annexed or detached.
Sec. 9. After receiving the report of the regional planning
coalition and not more than 60 days after the receipt of the notice
of intention to annex or detach, the commission shall set the date,
time and place for a public hearing on the proposal and shall
provide notice of the date, time and place of the public hearing not
less than 15 days before the date set for the public hearing to:
1. The board of county commissioners;
2. Each city within 7 miles of the exterior boundaries of the
territory proposed to be annexed or detached;
3. Any interested person who has filed a written request with
the executive officer of the commission for notice; and
4. The proponents of the annexation.
Sec. 10. When reviewing a proposal to annex or detach
territory, the factors that must be considered by the commission
include, without limitation:
1. For an annexation or detachment:
(a) The population, population density, land area and land
uses, per capita assessed valuation, topography, including natural
boundaries and drainage basins, proximity to other populated
areas and the likelihood of significant growth in the area and in
adjacent incorporated and unincorporated areas during the next
10 years;
(b) The need for organized community services, the present
cost and adequacy of governmental services and controls in the
area, probable future needs for such services and controls and the
probable effect of the proposed formation and of alternative
courses of action on the cost and adequacy of services and
controls in the area and adjacent areas;
(c) The effect of the proposed annexation or detachment and
of alternative actions upon the availability and requirement of
water and other natural resources throughout the affected area;
(d) The effect of the proposed annexation or detachment and
of alternative actions on adjacent areas, on mutual social and
economic interests and on the local government structure of the
county; and
(e) The report of the plan for the extension of services required
by NRS 268.578 or the report of the plan for the detachment of
services required by section 6 of this act, as applicable; and
2. For an annexation, in addition to the factors described in
subsection 1:
-
*SB61*

– 9 –
(a) Any determination by the United States Bureau of Land
Management that the territory proposed to be annexed is suitable
for residential, commercial or industrial development, or will be
opened to private acquisition; and
(b) The consistency of the annexation proposal with any
applicable comprehensive regional plan, area plan or master plan
and the program of annexation adopted and certified pursuant to
section 3 of this act.
Sec. 11. 1. Upon the conclusion of the public hearing held
by the commission on a proposal to annex or detach territory, the
commission may take the matter under consideration and shall not
later than 30 days after the conclusion of the public hearing,
present its determination on the proposal. The commission may
also adjourn a public hearing to another date, which must not be
more than 30 days after the date of the first hearing.
2. If the commission determines that a proposal for
annexation is prohibited by NRS 268.581, the commission shall
disapprove the proposal.
3. If a comprehensive regional policy plan has been
developed pursuant to NRS 278.02528 for the region in which the
commission is located, the commission shall:
(a) Disapprove a proposal for annexation or detachment that
is determined by the regional planning coalition to be inconsistent
with the comprehensive regional policy plan or with the program
of annexation adopted and certified pursuant to section 3 of this
act; or
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, approve a
proposal for annexation or detachment that is consistent with the
comprehensive regional policy plan and the program of
annexation adopted and certified pursuant to section 3 of this act.
4. If the commission:
(a) Approves the annexation or detachment, the proceedings
on the proposal may be continued in accordance with the
provisions of NRS 268.570 to 268.608, inclusive, and sections 2 to
13, inclusive, of this act.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, disapproves
the annexation or detachment, further proceedings on the
proposal must terminate.
5. Not later than 5 days after the final determination of the
commission, notice of the final determination of the commission
must be sent to the clerk of the governing body of the city to which
the annexation or detachment is pending, which must include,
without limitation, the findings of fact of the commission upon
which the determination was based.
-
*SB61*

– 10 –
6. If a county and affected cities have executed an interlocal
agreement to transfer the duties of the commission to the regional
planning coalition, a county or city may appeal a determination of
the regional planning coalition by filing an objection with the
regional planning coalition not later than 45 days after the
issuance of the determination, which must include, without
limitation, the reasons why the plan is in conformance with the
comprehensive regional policy plan. The regional planning
coalition shall consider the objection and issue its final
determination of conformance or nonconformance not later than
45 days after the objection is filed.
7. If the commission disapproves the annexation or
detachment, notice of intention to annex or detach the same or
substantially the same territory to that city may not be filed with
the commission for at least 1 year after the date of the final
determination.
Sec. 12. 1. If a majority of the property owners:
(a) Protest the detachment, either orally at the public hearing
or in writing within 15 days after the conclusion of the public
hearing, the governing body of the city shall not detach in that
proceeding any part of the territory described in the notice. This
provision does not preclude a subsequent proceeding with respect
to all or part of that territory if that proceeding is commenced
more than 1 year after the date of the public hearing.
(b) Do not protest the annexation in the manner or within the
time limited by paragraph (a), the governing body may proceed
with the detachment pursuant to subsection 2.
2. At any regular or special meeting thereof held not earlier
than 16 days and not later than 90 days after the conclusion of the
public hearing, the governing body of the city may adopt an
ordinance detaching the territory described in the notice of the
public hearing pursuant to NRS 268.586 and which the governing
body has determined should be detached.
3. At a meeting held pursuant to subsection 2, the governing
body may amend the report required by section 6 of this act to
make changes in the plan for the detachment of services to the
area proposed to be detached if the changes meet the requirements
of section 7 of this act.
4. If the ordinance to detach is passed by the governing body
pursuant to subsection 2, the city clerk shall file a certified copy of
the map filed in accordance with section 6 of this act and the
ordinance with the county recorder of the county. Upon such
filing, the change in the boundaries of the city shall be deemed
complete and the territory detached.
-
*SB61*

– 11 –
Sec. 13. If the territory is detached from a city pursuant to
section 12 of this act, the governing body shall provide for a
proportion of any outstanding general obligations of the city as the
assessed valuation of property in the territory bears to the total
assessed valuation of property in the city and for the proportion of
any obligations secured by the pledge of revenues from a public
improvement as the revenue arising within the territory bears to
the total revenue from the public improvement as follows:
1. If the territory is annexed to another city, the proportionate
obligation must be assumed according to its terms by the annexing
city;
2. If the territory is not annexed to another city, the board of
county commissioners shall levy taxes upon all taxable property in
the district, sufficient to discharge the proportionate general
obligation according to its terms; or
3. Where substantially all of the physical improvements for
which the obligation was incurred are within the territory
remaining, and with the consent of the governing body of the city
from which the territory was detached and the holders of the
obligations, the entire obligation may be assumed by the city and
the detached territory released from the obligation.
Sec. 14. NRS 268.574 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.574 As used in NRS 268.570 to 268.608, inclusive [:] ,
and sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this act:
1. “City” means an incorporated city.
2. “Commission” means a city annexation and detachment
commission created pursuant to section 4 of this act or, in a
county which has entered into an interlocal agreement pursuant to
subsection 5 of section 4 of this act, the regional planning
coalition.
3. “Contiguous” means either abutting directly on the boundary
of the annexing municipality or separated from the boundary thereof
by a street, alley, public right-of-way, creek, river or the right-of-
way of a railroad or other public service corporation, or by lands
owned by the annexing municipality, by some other political
subdivision of the State or by the State of Nevada.
4. “Executive officer” means:
(a) With respect to a city annexation and detachment
commission, the county manager or similar administrative officer
of the county; and
(b) With respect to a city annexation and detachment
commission in a county that has executed an interlocal agreement
pursuant to subsection 5 of section 4 of this act, the head or
similar administrative officer of the regional planning coalition.
-
*SB61*

– 12 –
[2.] 5. “Lot or parcel” means any tract of land of sufficient size
to constitute a legal building lot as determined by the zoning
ordinance of the county in which the territory proposed to be
annexed is situated. If such county has not enacted a zoning
ordinance, the question of what constitutes a building lot shall be
determined by reference to the zoning ordinance of the annexing
municipality.
[3.] 6. “Majority of the property owners” in a territory means
the record owners of real property:
(a) Whose combined value is greater than 50 percent of the total
value of real property in the territory, as determined by assessment
for taxation; and
(b) Whose combined area is greater than 50 percent of the total
area of the territory, excluding lands held by public bodies.
[4.] 7. “Regional planning coalition” means the regional
planning coalition established pursuant to NRS 278.02514 or a
public body appointed by the governing body of a city pursuant to
section 2 of this act.
8. “Sphere of influence” means an area into which a city
plans to expand.
9. A lot or parcel of land is “used for residential purposes” if it
is 5 acres or less in area and contains a habitable dwelling unit of a
permanent nature.
Sec. 15. NRS 268.576 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.576 The governing body of any incorporated city, whether
incorporated or governed under a general act, special legislative act
or special charter enacted, adopted or granted pursuant to either
Section 1 or Section 8 of Article 8 of the Constitution of the State of
Nevada, may extend the corporate limits of such city or detach
territory from the corporate limits of such city under the procedures
[or alternative procedures] set forth in NRS 268.570 to 268.608,
inclusive [.] , and sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 16. NRS 268.578 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.578 [Any]
1. Upon initiating annexation proceedings pursuant to NRS
268.584 using any of the methods set forth in NRS 268.582, any
city exercising authority to annex territory under NRS 268.570 to
268.608, inclusive, and sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this act shall
make plans for the extension of services to the territory proposed to
be annexed and shall [, at least 20 days before the public hearing
provided for in NRS 268.590,] prepare and file with its city clerk a
report setting forth the plans to provide services to the territory. The
report must include:
-
*SB61*

– 13 –
[1.] (a) An accurate map or plat of the territory proposed to be
annexed, prepared under the supervision of a competent surveyor or
engineer.
[2.] (b) A map or maps of the city and the adjacent territory to
show the following information:
[(a)] (1) The present and proposed boundaries of the annexing
city.
[(b)] (2) The present streets and sewer interceptors and outfalls
and, if the annexing city operates its own water system or furnishes
other utility services, the present major trunk water lines and other
utility lines.
[(c)] (3) The proposed extensions of the present streets, sewer
interceptors and outfalls, major trunk water mains and utility lines,
as the case may be, as required in [subsection 4.] paragraph (d).
[(d)] (4) The present and proposed general land use pattern in
the territory proposed to be annexed.
[3.] (c) A statement showing that the territory proposed to be
annexed meets the requirements of NRS 268.580.
[4.] (d) A statement setting forth the plans of the annexing city
for extending into the territory proposed to be annexed each major
municipal service performed within the annexing city at the time of
annexation. Specifically, such plans:
[(a)] (1) Must provide for extending police protection, fire
protection, street maintenance and garbage collection to the territory
proposed to be annexed on the effective date of the annexation, on
substantially the same basis and in the same manner as such services
were provided by the annexing city to the property owners and
residents within the remainder of the city immediately before the
effective date of the annexation.
[(b)] (2) Must provide for the extension of streets, sewer
interceptors and outfalls and other major municipal services into the
territory proposed to be annexed so that when the streets and utility
services are so extended, property owners and residents in the
territory proposed to be annexed will be able to secure such
services, according to the policies in effect in the annexing city for
furnishing such services to individual lots or subdivisions.
[(c)] (3) May provide that the extension of streets, sewer
interceptors and outfalls and other major municipal services be done
at the expense of the property owners in the territory proposed to be
annexed, if it is the policy of the annexing city, at the time of the
annexation, to furnish such services to individual lots or
subdivisions at the expense of the property owners, either by means
of special assessment districts or the requirement of the dedication
of essential rights-of-way and the installation of off-site
improvements as a prerequisite to the approval of subdivision plats
-
*SB61*

– 14 –
or to the issuance of any building permit, rezoning, zone variance or
special use permit. In that event, the plans must designate which
services, or portions thereof, will be extended at the expense of the
annexing city and which services, or portions thereof, will be
extended at the expense of the property owners. Services extended
at the property owners’ cost must be distributed and allocated to
each parcel of property based on current costs, including both
improvement costs and projected service costs, and must be a part of
the annexation plan prepared by the municipality.
[(d)] (4) Must, if the extension of any streets, sewer interceptors
and outfalls or other major municipal services into the territory
proposed to be annexed is to be done at the expense of the annexing
city, set forth a proposed schedule for the construction of the
extensions as soon as possible following the effective date of the
annexation. In any event, the plans must call for contracts to be let
and construction to begin within 24 months following the effective
date of the annexation.
[(e)] (5) Must set forth the method under which the annexing
city plans to finance the extension of any services into the territory
proposed to be annexed which is to be done at the expense of the
annexing city.
2. Not later than 7 days after the report required by this
section is filed with the city clerk, the city clerk shall file with the
commission a notice of the intention of the governing body to
initiate the annexation, which must include, without limitation,
the resolution passed pursuant to NRS 268.584 and the report
prepared pursuant to this section.
Sec. 17. NRS 268.581 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.581 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the
governing body of a city shall not annex into the corporate limits of
the city territory that:
(a) Is conveyed or transferred to the county, or authorized to be
conveyed or transferred to the county, pursuant to a federal law that:
(1) Is enacted after January 1, 2000; and
(2) Conveys or transfers to the county, or authorizes to be
conveyed or transferred to the county, at least 5,000 acres for the
purpose of:
(I) Developing an airport and any related infrastructure;
or
(II) Addressing noise compatibility issues related to an
airport; or
(b) Is located not more than 1 mile from any territory described
in paragraph (a).
2. The governing body of a city may annex into the corporate
limits of the city any territory described in subsection 1 if, in
-
*SB61*

– 15 –
addition to the governing body of the city complying with the
procedures for annexation set forth in NRS [268.578] 268.570 to
[268.596,] 268.608, inclusive, [or the alternative procedures set
forth in NRS 268.597,] and sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this act,
one of the following circumstances apply:
(a) The annexation is approved by a resolution of the board of
county commissioners of the county;
(b) The annexation occurs before May 29, 2023;
(c) The annexation occurs before the effective date of the federal
law which causes the territory to satisfy the criteria set forth in
subsection 1; or
(d) The territory is located within the boundaries of an area
subject to an interlocal agreement between the governing body of
the city and the board of county commissioners for joint land use
planning which has a term of not less than 5 years.
Sec. 18. NRS 268.582 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.582 [In addition to initiating] The governing body of any
city may initiate annexation or detachment proceedings [on its own
motion pursuant to NRS 268.584, the governing body of any city
shall commence action] in accordance with the provisions of NRS
[268.584] 268.570 to [268.590,] 268.608, inclusive, [upon] and
sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this act:
1. On its own motion;
2. Upon the petition of the board of county commissioners ; [,]
or [upon]
3. Upon the petition of a majority of [the] :
(a) For an annexation, the owners of real property in an
unincorporated area developed for urban purposes which is
approximately described in the petition.
(b) For a detachment, the owners of real property of the
territory sought to be detached.
Sec. 19. NRS 268.584 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.584 [The]
1. To initiate annexation proceedings on its own motion or
upon petition as set forth in NRS 268.582, the governing body of
any city desiring to annex territory under the provisions of NRS
268.570 to 268.608, inclusive, and sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of
this act, shall [first pass] :
(a) Pass a resolution stating the intent of the city to consider the
annexation. The resolution must:
[1.] (1) Describe the boundaries of the territory proposed to be
annexed;
[2.] (2) Fix the date for a public hearing on the question of
annexation, which must not be less than 30 days nor more than 60
days following the passage of the resolution; and
-
*SB61*

– 16 –
[3.] (3) Direct that notice of the public hearing be given in the
manner provided in NRS 268.586 [.] ; and
(b) Make plans for the extension of services to the territory
proposed to be annexed in accordance with NRS 268.578.
2. The city clerk shall transmit a copy of the resolution passed
pursuant to subsection 1 to the board of county commissioners.
Sec. 20. NRS 268.586 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.586 1. Upon receiving notice from the commission that
a proposal to attach or detach territory has been approved
pursuant to section 11 of this act, the city clerk shall set a date,
time and place for a public hearing on the proposal and post
notice of the public hearing. The notice of public hearing must:
(a) Fix the date, hour and place of the public hearing.
(b) Describe accurately the territory proposed to be annexed [.]
or detached.
(c) State that the report required in NRS 268.578 or section 6 of
this act, as applicable, will be available at the office of the city clerk
of the [annexing] city at least 20 days before the date of the public
hearing.
(d) Contain a list of the names and addresses of all record
owners of real property within the territory proposed to be annexed
[.] or detached.
(e) Contain a statement to the effect that unless a majority of the
property owners in the territory proposed to be annexed or detached
protest the annexation [,] or detachment, as applicable, either orally
at the public hearing or in writing within 15 days after the
conclusion of the public hearing, the governing body may adopt an
ordinance :
(1) If annexing, extending the corporate limits of the
[annexing] city to include all, or any part, of the territory described
in the notice [.] ; and
(2) If detaching, contracting the corporate limits of the city
to detach all, or any part, of the territory described in the notice.
2. Any record owner of real property within the territory
proposed to be annexed or detached may:
(a) Appear and be heard at the public hearing;
(b) File with the city clerk of the [annexing] city a written
protest to the annexation or detachment at any time within 15 days
after the conclusion of the public hearing; or
(c) Do both.
3. The notice must be given by publication in a newspaper of
general circulation in the territory proposed to be annexed [,] or
detached, or, if there is none, in a newspaper of general circulation
published in the county. If no such newspapers are published, a copy
of the notice must be posted at the front door of the city hall or the
-
*SB61*

– 17 –
county courthouse and in at least two conspicuous places in the
territory proposed to be annexed or detached for not less than 20
days before the public hearing. The first publication of the notice
must be at least 20 days before the date set for the public hearing,
and three publications in a newspaper published at least once a week
are sufficient, but the first and last publication must be at least 6
days apart. The period of notice commences upon the first day of
publication and terminates either upon the day of the third
publication or at the end of the 20th day, including therein the first
day, whichever period is longer. At the time of the first publication,
the city clerk of the [annexing] city shall send a copy of the notice
by certified mail, return receipt requested, to each record owner of
real property within the territory proposed to be annexed [.] or
detached.
Sec. 21. NRS 268.588 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.588 At least 20 days before the date of the public hearing,
the governing body of the [annexing] city shall [approve] make the
report [provided for in] required by NRS 268.578 [and shall make
the same] or section 6 of this act, as applicable, and the findings of
the commission available to the public at the office of the city clerk.
In addition, the governing body may direct the preparation of a
summary of the full report for public distribution with the notice of
the public hearing and at such hearing.
Sec. 22. NRS 268.590 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.590 1. At the public hearing a representative of the
[annexing] city shall first make an explanation of the report
[provided for in] required by NRS 268.578 [.] or section 6 of this
act, as applicable.
2. Following such explanation, any record owner of real
property within the territory proposed to be annexed or detached
shall be given an opportunity to be heard.
3. Any protest to such annexation or detachment shall be
deemed waived unless the same is presented verbally at such public
hearing, or is filed in writing with the city clerk of the [annexing]
city within 15 days after the conclusion of such public hearing. In
the case of mailed protests, the postmark on the envelope shall be
deemed to be the date of filing.
Sec. 23. NRS 268.594 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.594 1. Whenever it is necessary for the purposes of NRS
268.570 to 268.608, inclusive, and sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of
this act to determine the number or identity of the record owners of
real property in a territory proposed to be annexed [,] or detached, a
list of such owners, certified by the county assessor on any date
between the institution of the proceedings, as provided in NRS
268.584 [,] or section 6 of this act, and the public hearing, as
-
*SB61*

– 18 –
provided in NRS 268.590, both dates inclusive, shall be prima facie
evidence that only those persons named thereon are such owners.
2. A petition or protest is sufficient for the purposes of NRS
268.570 to 268.608, inclusive, and sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of
this act as to any lot or parcel of real property which is owned:
(a) As community property, if it is signed by one spouse.
(b) By two persons, either natural or artificial, other than as
community property, if signed by both such owners.
(c) By more than two persons, either natural or artificial, if
signed by a majority of such owners.
(d) Either wholly or in part, by an artificial person, if it is signed
by an authorized agent and accompanied by a copy of such
authorization.
Sec. 24. NRS 268.602 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.602 1. If, not earlier than 24 months after the effective
date of the annexation, and not later than 27 months after the
effective date of the annexation, any record owner of real property
in the annexed territory believes that the annexing city has failed to
follow through on its service plans, adopted under the provisions of
[paragraphs (a)] subparagraphs (1) and [(d)] (4) of paragraph (d)
of subsection [4] 1 of NRS 268.578, with respect to extensions of
services to be made at the expense of the annexing city, the property
owner may apply to the district court having jurisdiction of the
annexing territory for a writ of mandamus to compel the extension
of those services.
2. The court may grant the relief prayed for in the application
if:
(a) The annexing city has not provided the services set forth in
its plan submitted under the provisions of subparagraph (1) of
paragraph [(a)] (d) of subsection [4] 1 of NRS 268.578, on
substantially the same basis and in the same manner as such services
were provided by the annexing city to the property owners and
residents within the remainder of the city on the effective date of the
annexation; and
(b) At the time the writ is sought, the services set forth in the
plan submitted under the provisions of subparagraph (1) of
paragraph [(a)] (d) of subsection [4] 1 of NRS 268.578 are still
being provided to the property owners and residents within the
remainder of the city on substantially the same basis and in the same
manner as on the effective date of the annexation.
3. The court may also grant the relief prayed for in the
application if:
(a) The plans submitted under the provisions of subparagraph
(4) of paragraph (d) of subsection [4] 1 of NRS 268.578 require the
-
*SB61*

– 19 –
extension of any services into the annexed territory to be made at
the expense of the annexing city;
(b) Contracts have not been let and construction has not begun;
and
(c) The applicant demonstrates that the need still exists for the
extension of those services into the annexed territory.
4. If a writ is made permanent, the cost in the action, including
reasonable attorney’s fees for the aggrieved person, must be
assessed against the annexing city.
Sec. 25. NRS 268.604 is hereby amended to read as follows:
268.604 1. Any person , city or county appearing and
protesting [such] an annexation or detachment at the public
hearing, as provided in NRS 268.590, or any person , city or county
filing with the city clerk of the annexing or detaching city a written
protest to such annexation or detachment, as applicable, within 15
days after the conclusion of such public hearing, who believes that
[he or she] the person, city or county will suffer material injury, by
reason of the failure of the governing body of the [annexing] city to
comply with the procedure set forth in NRS 268.570 to 268.608,
inclusive, and sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this act or , for an
annexation, to meet the requirements set forth in NRS 268.580 or
268.581, if applicable, as the same applies to [his or her] the
property [,] of the person, city or county, shall have the right, within
30 days from the date of the adoption of the [annexation] ordinance,
to apply to the district court having jurisdiction of the annexed or
detached territory for an order staying the effectiveness of such
[annexation] ordinance.
2. Such application shall explicitly state what exceptions are
taken to the action of the governing body and what relief the
applicant seeks.
3. The court shall accord such application precedence over any
civil business not involving the public interest.
4. In hearing and deciding on such application, the court shall
consider any evidence or statements introduced at the public hearing
on such annexation [,] or detachment, and any evidence which it
finds to have been arbitrarily or capriciously excluded. If the court
finds that any of the steps required by NRS 268.570 to 268.608,
inclusive, and sections 2 to 13, inclusive, of this act have not been
taken or that the governing body has abused its discretion in taking
any such action, or that the requirements set forth in NRS 268.580
or 268.581, if applicable, have not been met, the court shall make
such temporary or final order in the premises as the ends of justice
may require.
-
*SB61*

– 20 –
5. All actions or suits attacking the validity of the proceedings
not brought within the 30-day period shall thereafter be perpetually
barred.
Sec. 26. 1. The members of the city annexation and
detachment commission created pursuant to section 4 of this act
must be appointed in accordance with section 4 of this act not later
than January 1, 2026.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of section 4 of
this act, the members of the commission appointed pursuant to
subsection 1 serve until December 31, 2026.
Sec. 27. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 28. NRS 268.597 is hereby repealed.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
268.597 Alternative procedures for annexing territory.
1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 268.581, as an
alternative to the procedures for annexation set forth in NRS
268.578 to 268.596, inclusive, the governing body of a city may,
subject to the provisions of NRS 268.595, annex territory:
(a) That meets the requirements of subsection 2 of NRS 268.580
if all of the owners of record of individual lots or parcels of land
within the territory sign a petition requesting the governing body to
annex the territory to the city;
(b) That, on January 1, 2001, was undeveloped land and was
bounded on at least 75 percent of its aggregate external boundaries
by the existing corporate boundaries of the annexing city, if the
governing body provides or will provide, within a reasonable period,
municipal services to the territory that are substantially equivalent to
the municipal services provided by the governing body to any area
of the city and the governing body does not, on or before October 1,
2001, enter into a cooperative agreement with the governing body of
the governmental entity within whose boundaries the territory is
located which provides for the cooperation of the parties to the
agreement concerning issues of land use and boundaries of that
territory; or
(c) That is undeveloped land and is bounded on at least 75
percent of its aggregate external boundaries by the existing
corporate boundaries of the annexing city and for which the
-
*SB61*

– 21 –
governing body has received a written statement from a
governmental entity indicating that the governmental entity:
(1) Owns the territory; and
(2) Does not object to the annexation of that territory by the
governing body.
2. If:
(a) A petition specified in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 is
accepted by the governing body;
(b) The territory proposed for annexation meets the
requirements of paragraph (b) of subsection 1; or
(c) The governing body receives a written statement from a
governmental entity pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (c) of
subsection 1,
 the governing body may proceed to adopt an ordinance annexing
the territory and to take such other action that is appropriate to
accomplish the annexation.
3. As used in this section, “municipal services” includes,
without limitation:
(a) Water;
(b) Sewerage;
(c) Police protection;
(d) Fire protection;
(e) Parks;
(f) Maintenance of streets; and
(g) Master planning for:
(1) The development and use of land;
(2) The provision of water and sewerage by the governing
body; or
(3) The construction of regional infrastructure, including
systems for the control of floods and street and utility projects.
H
-
*SB61*